vi: Tỷ lệ xe đồ chơi tương thích: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Khác
it: Scala del veicolo giocattolo compatibile: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Altro
ro-RO: Scară compatibilă pentru vehicule de jucărie: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Altele
el: Συμβατή κλίμακα οχήματος παιχνιδιού: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Άλλο
en: Compatible toy vehicle scale: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Other
pt-PT: Escala do veículo de brinquedo compatível: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Outra
zh-TW: 相容玩具車比例: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); 其他
hr-HR: Kompatibilan omjer igračke vozila: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Ostalo
da: Kompatibel skala for legekøretøj: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Andet
th: มาตราส่วนรถของเล่นที่เข้ากันได้: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Kompatibilná veľkosť hračkárskeho autíčka: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Iné
tr: Uyumlu oyuncak araç ölçeği: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Diğer
hu: Kompatibilis játékjármű lépték: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Egyéb
fr: Échelle compatible pour véhicules miniatures: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Autre
bg-BG: Съвместим мащаб на превозното средство за игра: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Друг
sv: Kompatibel lekfordonsskala: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Övrigt
sl-SI: Združljivo merilo igrače vozila igrače: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Drugo
zh-CN: 兼容玩具车辆比例: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); 其他
fi: Yhteensopiva leluajoneuvon skaala: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Muu
es: Escala de vehículo de juguete compatible: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Otro
pl: Zgodna skala pojazdu do zabawy: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Inne
de: Kompatibler Spielfahrzeug-Maßstab: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (H0); Sonstige
lt-LT: Suderinamo dydžio žaislinė transporto priemonė: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Kita
nl: Compatibele speelgoedvoertuigschaal: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Overige
cs: Měřítko kompatibilních autíček: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (H0); Jiné
pt-BR: Escala de veículo de brinquedo compatível: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Outro
ja: 対応トイ車両スケール: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); その他
ru: Совместимый масштаб игрушечного транспорта: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Другое
ko: 호환 완구 차 스케일: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87(HO); 기타
nb: Kompatibel lekekjøretøyskala: 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:64; 1:87 (HO); Annet